Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 2. Information And Records.

Sec. 47.12.300.
Court records.

The court shall make and keep records of all cases brought before it.

The court shall forward a record of adjudication of a violation of an offense listed in AS

28.15.185

(a) to the Department of Administration if the court imposes a license revocation under AS

28.15.185

.

Except when disclosure of the name of a minor is authorized or required by this chapter and except as provided in (g) of this section, the name or picture of a minor under the jurisdiction of the court may not be made public in connection with the minor’s status as a delinquent unless authorized by order of the court.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, within 30 days of the date of a minor’s 18th birthday or, if the court retains jurisdiction of a minor past the minor’s 18th birthday, within 30 days of the date on which the court releases jurisdiction over the minor, the court shall order all the court’s official records pertaining to that minor in a proceeding under this chapter sealed, as well as records of all driver’s license proceedings under AS

28.15.185

, criminal proceedings against the minor, and punishments assessed against the minor. A person may not use these sealed records for any purpose except that the court may order their use for good cause shown or may order their use by an officer of the court in making a presentencing report for the court. The provisions of this subsection relating to the sealing of records do not apply to records of traffic offenses.

The court’s official records prepared under this chapter and not made public under this section are confidential and may be inspected only with the court’s permission and only by persons having a legitimate interest in them. A foster parent is considered to have a legitimate interest in those portions of the court’s official records relating to a child who is already placed with the foster parent or who is recommended for placement with the foster parent. A person with a legitimate interest in the inspection of a confidential record maintained by the court also includes a victim who suffered physical injury or whose real or personal property was damaged as a result of an offense that was the basis of an adjudication or modification of disposition. If the victim knows the identity of the minor, identifies the minor or the offense to the court, and certifies that the information is being sought to consider or support a civil action against the minor or against the minor’s parents or guardian under AS

09.65.255

, the court shall, subject to AS

12.61.110

and

12.61.140

, allow the victim to inspect and use the following records and information in connection with the civil action:

a petition filed under AS

47.12.040(a)

seeking to have the court declare the minor a delinquent;

a petition filed under AS

47.12.120

seeking to have the court modify or revoke the minor’s probation;

a petition filed under AS

47.12.100

requesting the court to find that a minor is not amenable to treatment under this chapter and that results in closure of a case under AS

47.12.100

(a); and

a court judgment or order entered under this chapter that disposes of a petition identified in (1) — (3) of this subsection.

A person who has been tried as an adult under AS

47.12.100(a)

or a person whose records have been made public under (g) of this section, or the department on the person’s behalf, may petition the superior court to seal the records of all criminal proceedings, except traffic offenses, initiated against the person, and all punishments assessed against the person, while the person was a minor. A petition under this subsection may not be filed until five years after the completion of the sentence imposed for the offense for which the person was tried as an adult or five years after a disposition was entered for an offense for which the records were made public under (g) of this section. If the superior court finds that its order has had its intended rehabilitative effect and further finds that the person has fulfilled all orders of the court entered under AS

47.12.120

, the superior court shall order the record of proceedings and the record of punishments sealed. Sealing the records restores civil rights removed because of a conviction. A person may not use these sealed records for any purpose except that the court may order their use for good cause shown or may order their use by an officer of the court in making a presentencing report for the court. The court may not, under this subsection, seal records of a criminal proceeding

initiated against a person if the court finds that the person has not complied with a court order made under AS

47.12.120

; or

commenced under AS

47.12.030(a)

unless the minor has been acquitted of all offenses with which the minor was charged or unless the most serious offense of which the minor was convicted was not an offense specified in AS

47.12.030(a)

.

When a district attorney has elected to seek imposition of a dual sentence and a petition has been filed under AS

47.12.065

, or when a minor agrees as part of a plea agreement to be subject to dual sentencing, all court records shall be open to the public except for predisposition reports, psychiatric and psychological reports, and other documents that the court orders to be kept confidential because the release of the documents could be harmful to the minor or could violate the constitutional rights of the victim or other persons.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, this section does not apply to the records of a minor who is waived into adult court under AS

47.12.030

or

47.12.100

and is subject to this chapter only to the extent that AS

47.12.105

applies to the minor.

A person who discloses confidential information in violation of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 64 SLA 1997; am E.O. No. 99 § 76 (1997); am §§ 35 — 39 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 9 ch 40 SLA 1999; am § 40 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, in subsection (e), “AS

09.65.255

” was substituted for “AS

34.50.020

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

34.50.020

.

Subsection (h) was enacted as (i). Relettered in 2021, at which time former subsection (h) was relettered as subsection (i).

Cross references. —

For similar provisions related to children in need of aid, see AS

47.10.090

. For effect of subsection (g) on Alaska Delinquency Rule 27, see § 56, ch. 107, SLA 1998.

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 7 AAC 52, art. 3.

For confidentiality of client records: juvenile justice, see 7 AAC 54, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, added (i) [now (h)].

Editor’s notes. —

Section 57, ch. 107, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to this section apply “to all offenses committed on or after July 1, 1998.”

Sec. 47.12.310.
Agency records.

Except as specified in AS

47.12.315

,

47.12.320

, and (b) — (g) and (i) of this section, all information and social records pertaining to a minor who is subject to this chapter or AS 47.17 prepared by or in the possession of a federal, state, or municipal agency or employee in the discharge of the agency’s or employee’s official duty, including driver’s license actions under AS

28.15.185

, are privileged and may not be disclosed directly or indirectly to anyone without a court order.

A state or municipal agency or employee shall disclose

information regarding a case to a federal, state, or municipal law enforcement agency for a specific investigation being conducted by that agency;

appropriate information regarding a case to

a guardian ad litem appointed by the court;

a person or an agency requested by the department or the minor’s legal custodian to provide consultation or services for a minor who is subject to the jurisdiction of the court under this chapter as necessary to enable the provision of the consultation or services;

school officials as may be necessary to protect the safety of the minor who is the subject of the case and the safety of school students and staff or to enable the school to provide appropriate counseling and supportive services to meet the needs of a minor about whom information is disclosed;

a governmental agency as may be necessary to obtain that agency’s assistance for the department in its investigation or to obtain physical custody of a minor;

a law enforcement or corrections agency of this state or another jurisdiction as may be necessary for the protection, rehabilitation, care, or supervision of any minor or for actions by that agency to protect the public safety;

a victim or to the victim’s insurance company as may be necessary to inform the victim or the insurance company about the arrest of the minor, including the minor’s name and the names of the minor’s parents, copies of reports, or the disposition or resolution of a case involving a minor;

the state medical examiner under AS 12.65 as may be necessary to perform the duties of the state medical examiner;

foster parents or relatives with whom the child is placed by the department as may be necessary to enable the foster parents or relatives to provide appropriate care for the child who is the subject of the case, to protect the safety of the child who is the subject of the case, and to protect the safety and property of family members and visitors of the foster parents or relatives;

the Department of Law or its agent for use and subsequent release if necessary for collection of an order of restitution on behalf of the recipient;

the Violent Crimes Compensation Board established in AS

18.67.020

for use in awarding compensation under AS

18.67.080

;

a state, municipal, or federal agency of this state or another jurisdiction that has the authority to license adult or children’s facilities and services;

a child placement agency licensed under AS 47.32 as necessary to provide services for a minor who is subject to the jurisdiction of the court under this chapter;

a state or municipal agency of this state or another jurisdiction that is responsible for child protection services, as may be necessary for the administration of services, protection, rehabilitation, or supervision of a minor or for actions by the agency to protect the public safety;

the Department of Corrections as necessary for the administration of services, protection, rehabilitation, or supervision of any minor for release to the public as authorized by law, or as necessary to transfer detention of a minor who is waived into adult court under AS

47.12.030

or

47.12.100

and held under AS

47.12.105

; and

a corrections agency of this state or another jurisdiction as may be necessary for the protection, rehabilitation, care, or supervision of a former juvenile offender; and

to the University of Alaska under the Alaska higher education savings program for children established under AS

47.14.400

information that is necessary to support the program, but only if the information released is maintained as a confidential record by the University of Alaska.

A state or municipal law enforcement agency

shall disclose information regarding a case that is needed by the person or agency charged with making a preliminary investigation for the information of the court under this chapter;

may disclose to the public information regarding a criminal offense in which a minor is a suspect, victim, or witness if the minor is not identified by the disclosure;

may disclose to school officials information regarding a case as may be necessary to protect the safety of school students and staff or to enable the school to provide appropriate counseling and supportive services to meet the needs of a minor about whom information is disclosed;

may disclose to the public information regarding a case as may be necessary to protect the safety of the public; and

may disclose to a victim or to the victim’s insurance company information, including copies of reports, as necessary for civil litigation or insurance claims pursued by or against the victim.

Upon request of a victim, the department shall make every reasonable effort to notify the victim as soon as practicable, by telephone or in writing, when a delinquent minor is to be released from placement under AS

47.12.120(b)(1)

. The notice under this subsection must include the expected date of the delinquent minor’s release, the geographic area in which the delinquent minor is required to reside, and other pertinent information concerning the delinquent minor’s conditions of conduct or probation that may affect the victim.

A person may authorize the department to release information to the military or to a prospective employer about the existence of a delinquency adjudication against that person under this chapter and the offense on which it was based.

The department may release to a person with a legitimate interest information relating to a minor subject to the jurisdiction of the department under this chapter. The department shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 to implement this subsection, including regulations governing the release of information and standards for identifying a legitimate interest in the information.

The department and affected law enforcement agencies shall work with school districts and private schools to develop procedures for the disclosure of information to school officials under (b)(2)(C) and (c)(3) of this section. The procedures must provide a method for informing the principal or the principal’s designee of the school the student attends as soon as it is reasonably practicable.

Notwithstanding (c)(3) of this section, a state or municipal law enforcement agency is not required to notify the appropriate school official of a school district or school under (c) of this section if the agency determines that notice would jeopardize an ongoing investigation.

A state or municipal agency, other than a state or municipal law enforcement agency, or authorized employee may disclose to the public information regarding a case as may be necessary to protect the safety of the public provided the disclosure is authorized by regulations adopted by the department.

In this section, “school” means a public or private elementary or secondary school.

A person who discloses confidential information in violation of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 64 SLA 1997; am § 7 ch 94 SLA 1997; am § 46 ch 99 SLA 1998; am §§ 40, 41 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 39 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 2002; am § 30 ch 124 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 58 SLA 2007; am §§ 2, 3 ch 38 SLA 2012; am § 30 ch 9 SLA 2013; am §§ 41, 42 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 46, ch. 99, SLA 1998 and § 40, ch. 107, SLA 1998 both amended subsection (b). To reconcile chs. 99 and 107, SLA 1998, (b)(7) and (8), as enacted by § 46, ch. 99, SLA 1998, were renumbered as (b)(2)(G) and (H). The amendments to (b)(2)(E) made by § 46, ch. 99, SLA 1998 were used instead of those made by § 40, ch. 107, SLA 1998 because, if the amendments are not interpreted as conflicting, the ch. 99 amendments included the ch. 107 amendments and, if the amendments are interpreted as conflicting, the ch. 99 amendments had a later effective date than the ch. 107 amendments.

Subsection (i) was enacted as subsection (k).
Relettered in 2004, at which time former subsections (i) and (j) were relettered as subsections (j) and (k).

In 2007, in (b)(3) of this section, “AS

47.14.400

” was substituted for “AS 47.05.400” to reflect the 2007 renumbering on enactment of AS 47.05.400.

Cross references. —

For similar provisions related to children in need of aid, see AS

47.10.093

.

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 7 AAC 52, art. 3.

For confidentiality of client records: juvenile justice, see 7 AAC 54, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective July 1, 2004, added subsection (k) [now (i)].

The 2007 amendment, effective October 15, 2007, added paragraph (b)(3) and made related changes.

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, added (b)(2)(L) and (b)(2)(M); rewrote (f).

The 2013 amendment, effective May 10, 2013, in (a), inserted “and (i)” following “and (b) — (g)”.

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (b), in (b)(2)(E), inserted “or corrections” following “law enforcement” and “, care” following “rehabilitation, added (b)(2)(N), (O); in (d), deleted “in a juvenile facility” following “released from placement” near the end of the first sentence, substituted “conduct or probation” for “release” following “conditions of” near the end of the second sentence.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to subsection (b) made by ch. 99, SLA 1998 apply to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

Section 57, ch. 107, SLA 1998 provides that the amendments to this section made by ch. 107, SLA 1998 apply “to all offenses committed on or after July 1, 1998.”

Section 45, ch. 92, SLA 2001, provides that the amendment to subsection (b) made by ch. 92, SLA 2001 applies “to judgments or orders of restitution entered in adjudications of delinquency of minors or in criminal cases before, on, or after January 1, 2002.”

Section 32(e), ch. 124, SLA 2004, provides that subsection (i) of this section [enacted as subsection (k)] applies “to an offense occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2004.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Sec. 47.12.315.
Public disclosure of information in department records relating to certain minors.

Notwithstanding AS

47.12.310

and except as otherwise provided in this section, the department shall disclose information to the public, on request, concerning a minor subject to this chapter who was at least 13 years of age at the time of commission of

a felony offense against a person under AS 11.41;

arson in the first or second degree;

burglary in the first degree;

distribution of child pornography;

sex trafficking in the first degree;

misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first, second, or third degrees involving distribution or possession with intent to deliver; or

misconduct involving weapons in the first through fourth degrees.

The department may disclose the information authorized in (a) of this section only if a court has adjudicated the minor as delinquent.

When required by this section to disclose information, the department may disclose only the name of the minor, the name of each legal parent or guardian, the specific offense for which the minor was adjudicated delinquent, and the final outcome of the court proceedings relating to the offense. Before the disclosure, the department shall delete the information that identifies the victim of the offense.

The department may not disclose the name of an out-of-home care provider with whom the minor was living at the time the minor was alleged to have committed the offense.

If the department or other state or municipal agency maintains the information to be disclosed by electronic means that can be recovered from a computer database, the department or agency may disclose the information in that medium.

The department may not release information under this section after five years from the date the department or other agency is first required or authorized to make the disclosure under this section.

When disclosure is required under this section, the department may petition the court for an order prohibiting the disclosure. The court may grant the petition if, based on information presented in the petition or at an in camera hearing held on the petition, the court finds that

the crime was an isolated incident and the minor does not present any further danger to the public; or

the victim agrees that disclosure is inappropriate.

In this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “out-of-home care provider” means a person, other than the child’s legal parents, with whom a child who is in the custody of the state under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, or AS 47.14 is currently placed, including a foster parent, a relative other than a parent, and a person who has petitioned for adoption or guardianship of the child.

History.

(§§ 8, 10 ch 64 SLA 1997; am § 70 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 25 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am § 4 ch 38 SLA 2012; am § 168 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 130 ch 4 FSSLA 2019; am § 43 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, in (a)(5) of this section, “sex trafficking” was substituted for “promoting prostitution” to reconcile § 4, ch. 38, SLA 2012 and § 25, ch. 1, TSSLA 2012.

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 7 AAC 52, art. 3.

For confidentiality of client records: juvenile justice, see 7 AAC 54, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective June 3, 2003, in paragraph (d)(1) deleted “, as that term is defined in AS

47.14.299

,” following the first instance of “out-of-home care provider” near the beginning and added the definitions of “out-of-home care provider” and “agency or person.”

The first 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, rewrote the section.

The second 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in former (a)(1)(F), now (a)(5), substituted “sex trafficking” for “promoting prostitution”.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a)(6), deleted “, or third” preceding “degrees involving distribution”; and made a related change.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, substituted “first, second, or third degrees” for “first or second degrees” in (a)(6).

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (c), substituted “for which the minor was adjudicated delinquent” for “alleged to have been committed in the petition” following “specific offense” in the first sentence.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 27(a), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendment to (a)(5) made in § 25, ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, changing the phrase “promoting prostitution” to “sex trafficking”, applies to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1665 — 1669.

Sec. 47.12.320.
Disclosure of information to public officials.

Notwithstanding AS

47.12.300

and

47.12.310

,

a parent or legal guardian of a minor subject to a proceeding under this chapter may disclose confidential or privileged information about the minor, including information that has been lawfully obtained from agency or court files, to the governor, the lieutenant governor, a legislator, the ombudsman appointed under AS 24.55, the attorney general, and the commissioners of health and social services, administration, or public safety, or an employee of these persons, for review or use in their official capacities;

the department may disclose confidential or privileged information about the minor and make available for inspection documents about the minor to the state officials or employees identified in (1) of this subsection for review or use in their official capacities; and

a person to whom disclosure is made under (1) or (2) of this subsection may not disclose confidential or privileged information about the minor to a person not authorized to receive it.

The disclosure right under (a)(1) of this section is in addition to, and not in derogation of, the rights of a parent or legal guardian of a minor.

A person who violates a provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable for the violation in the manner authorized under AS 12.55 for a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am §§ 42, 43 ch 107 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For similar provisions related to children-in-need-of-aid, see AS

47.10.092

.

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 7 AAC 52, art. 3.

For confidentiality of client records: juvenile justice, see 7 AAC 54, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 57, ch. 107, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to this section apply “to all offenses committed on or after July 1, 1998.”